Utah statutes.
63G-9-303.   Meeting to examine claims -- Notice of meeting.
(1)  At least 60 days preceding the meeting of each Legislature the board
shall hold a session for the purpose of examining the claims referred to in
Section 63G-9-302, and may adjourn from time to time until the work is
completed.
(2)  The board shall cause notice of such meeting or meetings to be published:
(a)  in some newspaper at the seat of government and such other newspapers as
may be determined by the board for such time as the board may prescribe; and
(b)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.
